Maryland, session 2026, HB1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
23–401.
(f) (1) (I) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1122*

HOUSE BILL 1122
PARAGRAPH, A member who begins membership on or after July 1, 2011, may retire with
a normal service retirement allowance if:
[(i)] 1. the member completes and submits a written application
to the Board of Trustees stating the date when the member desires to retire; and
[(ii)] 2. on or before the date of retirement, the member:
[1.] A. has at least 90 years of combined age and years of
eligibility service; or
[2.] B. is at least 65 years old and has at least 10 years of
eligibility service.
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ELECTED OR APPOINTED AS THE
SHERIFF OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, AND IS A
MEMBER, MAY RETIRE WITH A NORMAL SERVICE RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE IF:
1. THE MEMBER COMPLETES AND SUBMITS A WRITTEN
APPLICATION TO THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES STATING THE DATE WHEN THE MEMBER
DESIRES TO RETIRE; AND
2. ON OR BEFORE THE DATE OF RETIREMENT, THE
MEMBER:
A. HAS AT LEAST 90 YEARS OF COMBINED AGE AND
YEARS OF ELIGIBILITY SERVICE; OR
B. IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD AND HAS AT LEAST 8 YEARS
OF ELIGIBILITY SERVICE.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, a member who is
subject to the reformed contributory pension benefit under Subtitle 2, Part IV of this title
is entitled to receive a normal service retirement that equals the number of years of the
member’s creditable service multiplied by 1.5% of the member’s average final
compensation.
29–306.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE SHERIFF OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING AS THE SHERIFF OF ANNE ARUNDEL
COUNTY WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM:
(1) HAS VESTING RIGHTS AFTER ACCRUING AT LEAST 8 YEARS OF

HOUSE BILL 1122 3
ELIGIBILITY SERVICE; AND
(2) IS ENTITLED TO A RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE AS PROVIDED IN
TITLE 23, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Anne Arundel County while serving in a term
of office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions of this Act
concerning the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Anne Arundel County shall take
effect at the beginning of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to
an individual appointed or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired
term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.